Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.16
Deteriorated paint, defined.

Deteriorated paint means paint that is cracking, flaking, chipping, peeling, or otherwise separating from the substrate of a building component.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 18.